Utah statutes.
72-4-301.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Committee" means the Utah State Scenic Byway Committee created in
Section 72-4-302.
(2)  "Non-scenic area" means:
(a)  any property that is unzoned or zoned for commercial or industrial use
adjoining a highway that does not contain at least one of the intrinsic
qualities described in Subsection 72-4-303(1)(b) immediately upon the
property; or
(b)  any property that is unzoned or zoned for commercial or industrial use
that contains an intrinsic quality described in Subsection 72-4-303(1)(b)
immediately upon the property but the intrinsic quality does not represent the
primary use of the property.
(3)  "Segmentation" means:
(a)  removing the scenic byway designation from a portion of an existing
scenic byway that adjoins a non-scenic area; or
(b)  excluding a portion of a highway from a scenic byway designation where
the highway adjoins a non-scenic area.
